Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Registered Nurses and Practical Nurses

§ 1621.
Registered nurse licensure by examination.

To be eligible for licensure as a registered nurse by examination, an applicant shall complete:

an approved U.S. registered nursing education program meeting requirements set by the Board by rule; and

examinations as determined by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1622.
Registered nurse licensure by endorsement.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, to be eligible for licensure as a registered nurse by endorsement, an applicant shall:

hold a current license to practice registered nursing in another U.S. jurisdiction based on education in a nursing program acceptable to the Board; and

meet practice requirements set by the Board by rule.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the Board shall issue a license to practice as a registered nurse to an applicant who:

is a service member or veteran;

has received designation by the U.S. Armed Forces as a 66H Nurse or equivalent;

has received at least a bachelor’s degree in nursing from a program that is accredited by the Accreditation Commission for Education in Nursing (ACEN) or by the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education (CCNE) or that is accepted by the U.S. Secretary of Education; and

has completed a qualified course in public health nursing or one year of supervised nursing experience.

As used in this section:

“Service member” means an individual who is an active member of:

the U.S. Armed Forces;

a reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces;

the U.S. Coast Guard; or

the National Guard of any state.

“Veteran” means a former service member who received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions from active duty not more than two years prior to submitting an application for licensure.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015; amended

2017, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1623.
Licensure for registered nurses educated outside the United States.

To be eligible for licensure under this chapter, a registered nurse applicant who was educated outside the United States shall:

hold a current registered nurse license from a country outside the United States;

complete secondary education;

graduate from a registered nursing education program meeting the requirements of rules set by the Board;

demonstrate English language proficiency, if the nursing education program was conducted in a language other than English; and

complete examinations as determined by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1624.
Registered nurse license renewal.

To renew a license, a registered nurse shall meet active practice requirements set by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1625.
Practical nurse licensure by examination.

To be eligible for licensure as a practical nurse by examination, an applicant shall:

complete an approved U.S. practical nursing education program meeting requirements set by the Board by rule or completion of equivalent study in a program conducted by the U.S. Armed Forces satisfactory to the Director; and

complete examinations as determined by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 1626.
Practical nurse licensure by endorsement.

To be eligible for licensure as a practical nurse by endorsement, an applicant shall:

hold a current license to practice practical nursing in another U.S. jurisdiction based on education in a nursing program acceptable to the Board; and

meet practice requirements set by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015; amended

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 1627.
Licensure for practical nurses educated outside the United States.

To be eligible for licensure under this chapter, a practical nurse applicant who was educated outside the United States shall:

hold a current practical nurse license from a country outside the United States;

complete secondary education;

graduate from a practical nursing education program meeting the requirements of rules set by the Board;

demonstrate English language proficiency if the nursing education program was conducted in a language other than English; and

complete examinations as determined by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1628.
Practical nurse license renewal.

To renew a license, a practical nurse shall meet active practice requirements set by the Board by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1629.
Fee waiver; pro bono practice.

A nurse who holds an unrestricted license in all jurisdictions in which the nurse is currently licensed, who certifies to the Board that he or she will limit his or her practice in Vermont to providing pro bono services at a free or reduced fee clinic, and who meets the requirements for licensure shall be licensed by the Board without payment of the licensing application fee.

A license granted under this section shall authorize the licensee to practice nursing on a voluntary basis in Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 28, 2015.